E. ANTI-CORRUPTION MEASURES 

1. Please provide succinct information on legislation or other rules governing this area, and adhesion to relevant international conventions (e.g. the Council of Europe Civil and Criminal Law Conventions on Corruption, the Council of Europe Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of proceeds from crime and the OECD Conventions on Combating Bribery of Foreign Public Officials in International Business Transactions and on Bribery in International Business Transactions) The following laws regulate the area of prevention and supression of corruption: The Law on Prevention of Corruption (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 28/02,46/04 and 83/04-consolidated text ) forsees preventive and protective mechanisms for prevention of corruption defined as abuse of official position, public authorisations, official duty or position for acquisition of personal gain, or gain for any other person. The Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04), is an important factor in the prevention of money laundering and other forms of crime. It provides a legal basis for more efficient system of preventive measures and actions against money laundering. At the same time, the Law is in compliance with the United Nations Convention against Trans-national Organised Crime, European Union Directive on Prevention of the Use of Financial System for the Purpose of Money Laundering 91/308/EEC and the European Union Directive 2001/97/EEC amending the previous one, and the FATF Forty Recommendations on Prevention of Money Laundering and the FATF Eight Special Recommendations Against Financing of Terrorism). The Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04) stipulates efficient measures for prevention of corruption and enhancement of the penal repression, defining at the same time efficient instruments for combating crime. The Criminal Code forsees criminal liability for legal entities as a precondition for successful fight against organised crime and corruption. The legal institute of confiscation of property or proceeds from criminal offences has also been stipulated.  The Law on Criminal Procedure (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) has been brought into line with the commitment to create legal basis for combating organised crime and corruption. In that manner, harmonisation of the domestic legislation with that of the European Union and with the provisions of the ratified international documents was ensured. Namely, with the amendments to this Law, an implementation of special investigative measures has been introduced in the legal system of the Republic of Macedonia. Furthermore, measures to secure defendant’s presence in the proceedings have been enhanced; protection has been ensured for witnesses, collaborators of justice and victims; a procedure has been prescribed to determine liability of legal entities as well as a procedure of confiscation of property and proceeds. The Law on the Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/04) regulates the procedure for efficient detection and prosecution of perpetrators of criminal acts related to organised crime and corruption. The Republic of Macedonia has undertaken a number of activities on international level, by ratifying numerous international documents in the area of prevention and fight against corruption and their implementation in the domestic legislation. The Republic of Macedonia has ratified the following international anti- corruption conventions:     Council of Europe Criminal Law Convention on Corruption (CETS 173) ratified on 28.07.1999 and entered into force on 01.07.2002 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 32/99);    Council of Europe Civil Law Convention on Corruption (CETS 174) ratified on 29.11.2002 and entered into force on 01.11.2003 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 13/02);    Council of Europe Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of the Proceeds from Crime (CETS 141) ratified on 19.05.2000 and entered into force on 01.09.2000 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” , No. 58/99);    United Nations Convention against Trans-national Organised Crime (Palermo Convention) with its Protocols ratified on 28.09.2004 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 70/04);    European Convention on Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters (CETS 030) and its Additional Protocol (CETS 099) ratified on 28.07.1999 and entered into force on 26.10.1999 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 32/99) and    Second Additional Protocol to the European Convention on Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters (CETS 182) ratified on 24.06.2003 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 44/03); In the forthcoming period, the Republic of Macedonia shall proceed towards ratification of the Additional Protocol to the Criminal Law Convention on Corruption (CETS 191) signed on 15.05.2003 and the United Nations Convention against Corruption, adopted by the UN General Assembly on 31.10.2003. Consultations have been initiated between the competent ministries regarding the accession of the Republic of Macedonia to the OECD Convention on Combating Bribery of Foreign Public Officials in International Business Transactions. The Republic of Macedonia has also ratified the Council of Europe Convention on the Transfer of Sentenced Persons (CETS 112) ratified on 28.07.1999 and entered into force on 01.11.1999 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 32/99) and its Additional Protocol (CETS 167) ratified on 28.07.1999 and entered into force on 01.06.2000 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 32/99); the European Convention on Extradition (CETS 024), its Additional Protocol (CETS 086) and the Second Additional Protocol (CETS 098) ratified on 28.07.1999 and entered into force 26.10.1999 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No 32/99);the European Convention on the Transfer of Proceedings in Criminal Matters (CETS 073) ratified on 29.11.2004 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 49/04) and the Council of Europe Convention on Cyber-crime (CETS 185) ratified on 15.09.2004 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 41/04); 
2. What anti-corruption laws exist? How and by which bodies are they implemented? a)  Lex specialis is the Law on Prevention of Corruption (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 28/02, 46/04 and 83/04 - consolidated text). This law introduces efficient measures for prevention of corruption. More precisely, the law defines the measures and the activities for prevention of corruption in exercing power, public authority, official duty and in politics; the measures and activities for prevention of conflict of interests; prevention of corruption while performing maters of public interest as well as prevention of corruption in the private sector. The penalties for acts of corruption remain in the sphere of the penal laws. b)  Penal laws that prohibit corruption and related acts and regulate the procedure: The Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03, and 19/04), in Chapter XXX includes the perpetration of criminal offences that are committed in exercising of duty and public authority which primarily violate the public authorisations as well as some other goods, rights or property. Corruption is incriminated in the following criminal offences: Receiving a bribe (article 357); Giving a bribe (article 358); Unlawful intermediation (article 359); Abuse of official position and public authority (article 353); Unconscientious performance of duties (article 353-v); Concealing the resources of disproportional acquired property (article 359-a); Abuse of public, business or military secret (article 360-a). In addition, the criminal code contains articles which define the acts of giving a bribe during elections and voting (article 162), and unauthorised reception of gifts (article 253) as special criminal offences.  The act of money laundering and other proceeds from crime (article 273) is incriminated as a specific criminal offence . The new definition of this offence contains elements which are in compliance with the European Union Directive on Prevention of the Use of the Financial System for the Purpose of Money Laundering (91/308/EEC and 2001/97-EEC amending the previous one), as well as with the following ratified conventions: The Council of Europe Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of the Proceeds from Crime (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.58/99); the United Nations Convention  against Trans-national Organised Crime with its Protocols (the Palermo Convention) (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.70/04). The Law on Criminal Procedure (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) establishes specific provisions for the use of special investigative measures (articles 142-b, 142-v, 142-d and 142-e), which are in accordance with the European standards for the use of adequate investigative measures necessary in discovering organised crime, corruption, money laundering, and other forms of serious crime offences.  The new provisions (articles No. 202, 203-a, 203-b, 203-g, and 207) in Chapter XVIII - Investigative Actionss- of the Law on Criminal Procedure stipulate the procedure for applying the measure of temporary securing of property or resources that are related with criminal offence. The measure in question can be applied as temporary freezing, seizure and confiscation of funds. These new legal instruments are harmonised with the following ratified conventions regulating this area: The Council of Europe Convention on Laundering, Search, Seizure and Confiscation of the Proceeds from Crime (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 58/99); the United Nations Convention (the Palermo Convention) against Trans-national Organised Crime with the Protocols (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.70/04) and the United Nations Convention Against Illicit Traffic in Narcotic Drugs and Psychotropic Substances and Precursors (the Vienna Convention) (“Official Gazette of the SFRY”, No.14/90) The Draft Law on Interception of Communications which implements the Amendment XIX of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) in relation to Article 17 is in parliamentary procedure. The amendment in question relates to the legalisation of the interception of communications, under certain conditions and procedure stipulated by law, if this is necessary for the prevention or revelation of criminal offences, for the course of a criminal procedure or if it is required by the interests of security and defence of the Republic. The  Law on Protection of Witnesses which will provide protection to witnesses that reveal information and are witnesses of acts of corruption and organised crime is also in parliamentary procedure. c)  Other laws containing provisions for prevention or suppression of corruption: The Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.46/04) provides and establishes an efficient system for organisation and control of the state bodies responsible to carry out measures and actions for discovering and prevention of money laundering and other proceeds from crime. It also regulates the competencies and authorisations of the bodies authorised for conducting an investigation. The Law on Financing of Political Parties (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 76/04) creates prerequisites for greater transparency, public responsibility, and accountability of the political parties. This law provides larger prerogatives for the responsible agencies to inspect and control the financing of the political parties.  The new Law on Public Procurement (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/04), establishes precise mechanisms and procedures for procurement of public goods, which outrule discretionary practices in the decision making, and provide transparency in the procedure. In addition, according to the provisions of the Law, a Public Procurement Bureau has been established. The Law on State Audit (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 65/97, 70/01, 31/03, 19/04 and 73/04 – consolidated text) strengthens the existing control mechanisms of state auditing. Besides this, the provisions of this law also stipulate that the Annual Report on Conducted Audits should include data on all material cases of corruption, of which the State Commission for Prevention of Corruption was notified (Article 11). In accordance with the Strategy for Judiciary Reform, the planned reforms for strengthening the independence and efficiency of the judiciary are generally aimed at strengthening the integrity of the judiciary. In that regard, the Law on the Court Budget (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/03) strengthens the independence of the judiciary in the field of financing and decision-making regarding the need for financial resources necessary for efficient functioning of the judiciary in the Republic of Macedonia. The abovementioned laws are implemented by the following state bodies: According to the Law on Prevention of Corruption a State Commission for the Prevention of Corruption has been established. For more details on the composition and the competencies of this Commission, see answer I_E_04).  The Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia, on the basis of the Law on Public Prosecutor’s Office (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/04) takes legal actions against persons who commit criminal offences. Pursuant to article 29 of this law, in the framework of the Public Prosecutor’s Office, a special Unit for fighting organised crime and corruption was established in September 2004. The Unit acts upon cases of this kind before all courts in the Republic of Macedonia, depending on their territorial jurisdiction and jurisdiction ratione materiae. With the establishment of this Unit, the Republic of Macedonia has implemented the recommendation of the Greco Group of the Council of Europe for the fight against corruption. This law gives a basis for strengthening the co-operation between the competent state bodies.  The police is performing its function of detecting the perpetrators of criminal acts according to the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03  19/04), the Criminal Code and the related secondary legislation. In accordance with the adopted Action Plan of the Police Reform Strategy, a Department for Organised Crime was established in January 2005. Within the framework of this Department in the Sector for Financial Crime, a Section for Money Laundering and Corruption is working on discovering cases of bribery and other corruptive actions.  For implementing the anti-corruption laws, a Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering, has been established in accordance with the Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.46/04). The Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering, as an administrative body within the Ministry of Finance, is responsible to gather data and process reports submitted by the subjects obliged to undertake measures and actions to detect and prevent money laundering, such as the Customs Office, the state bodies competent to carry out supervision, as well as other state bodies. The Directorate is also responsible to gather and process data from competent institutions from other countries. If during the processing of the reports, the Directorate finds that some transaction is suspicious, it is obliged to undertake a detailed analysis, to request additional information and documentation from state bodies or financial institutions or to gather information from foreign competent institutions for fight against money laundering and financing of terrorism.  The competencies of the Financial Police are regulated with the Law on Financial Police (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/02). It is responsible to control the implementation of the tax and custom regulations. It collects information and data in co-operation with the Ministry of Finance, the Ministry of the Interior, the Public Prosecutor’s Office and other state bodies in order to discover law violations in cases of tax evasion, money laundering, smuggling, trafficking of goods and products and other types of criminal offences that involve large or significant amount of taxes, customs or other revenues. The Financial Police within its competencies has special powers (law enforcement agency) in finance-related matters. In case of a reasonable doubt of a crime, the Financial police carry out investigative activities ex officio, upon request of the Public Prosecutor’s Office, Ministry of Finance, Ministry of the Interior, Public Revenue Office, Customs Office as well as the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering, or upon information of other administrative bodies or persons. The Law on Customs Administration (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04) clearly defines the competencies of the Customs Administration as a state body that secures the implementation of laws in the sphere of customs administration operations and other laws that fall under its competency, as well as the competencies, rights and special authorisations of the customs officers/officials. For more information on state bodies responsible for the implementation of anti-corruption laws, see answers I_E_4 and I_E_8
3. Is there a national anti-corruption strategy? What is its status? Does it cover both law enforcement and preventive measures? Was this the subject of broad consultation at all levels (e.g. interdepartmental at national, regional, local level, among stakeholders in the private sector and civil society, media etc.)? Is the strategy being implemented and, if so, how is this being done? Based on Article 55 of the Law on Prevention of Corruption, the State Commission for the Prevention of Corruption is authorised and obliged to draft and adopt a National Programme for Prevention and Suppression of Corruption. In addition, the State Commission is obliged by law to adopt annual programmes and plans for the National Programme implementation. In line with its legal obligations and its working programme the State Commission prepared, and on 17.06.2003 adopted the National Programme for Prevention and Suppression of Corruption, along with an Action Plan.  After its adoption, the National Programme was forwarded to the Assembly, the Government and the Supreme Court of the Republic of Macedonia, as well as to all other institutions and state bodies havingspecific competences in its implementation; to all embassies and representatives of international organisations in the Republic of Macedonia; to the relevant international organisations, such as Council of Europe, OECD and others; and to all diplomatic and consular missions abroad. Additionally it was communicated to the Government to harmonise and coordinate the activities in terms of implementation of the proposed measures and actions.  Hence, the Government adopted Guidelines on the Cooperation between the State Commission for the Prevention of Corruption and the State Administrative Bodies, Public Enterprises, Public Institutions and other legal entities managing with state capital (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 81/04). The Guidelines provide for co-operation by harmonising the activities and measures in the fight against corruption; by establishing and maintaining communication; by providing technical assistance through exchange of professional, academic and technical know-how, as well as by providing of information on persons suspected to have perpetrated actions which include elements of corruption. Pursuant to the Guidelines, an opinion is requested from the State Commission for the Prevention of Corruption whenever legal acts or their amendments regulating issues concerning the prevention of corruption are drafted.   The National Programme includes recommendations as to the necessary measures and activities that are to be undertaken in order to establish an efficient system of prevention and suppression of corruption.  The approach that was taken when drafting the National Programme was identification of possible solutions to the problems by applying empirical methods. This has enabled specification of optimal measures, which if fully implemented, would enable the creation of an efficient system of prevention and suppression of corruption in the Republic of Macedonia. The fact that constitutional amendments, a series of amendments to the existing laws and adoption of new ones followed, as well as the establishment of new institutions, can be seen as an additional confirmation of the comprehensive approach adopted in the preparation of the National Programme. This also speaks in favour of the fact that without deep and fundamental reforms in the state order and political system, in the judiciary, law enforcement institutions and the administration, statements on the commitment to the rule of law and democratic society are irrelevant. An integral part of the National Programme is the Action Plan for its implementation which envisages short, medium and long-term objectives, as well as a system of monitoring and evaluation of the implementation. According to the Action Plan, priority shall be given to preparation and adoption of new or amendments to existing laws, setting up new or strengthening the existing institutions, and strengthening the control mechanisms. Taking into consideration the significance of this document, the need to ensure its acceptance of all structures in the political life and the society as well as the need for multidisciplinary approach and the need to provide its efficient implementation, the State Commission, when preparing the National Programme, established fruitful cooperation with the Government, the Assembly, the Public Prosecutor’s Office, Ministry of the Interior, Ministry of Economy, State Audit Office, Civil Servants Agency, the Ombudsman etc. Particular contribution in the preparation of the National Programme was also provided by academics, independent experts and representatives from non-governmental organizations and the media, as well as experts of the Council of Europe, OSCE and the Stability Pact. Furthermore, the State Commission submitted the National Programme to the Assembly together with the 2002/2003 Annual Report on its operation. As a body authorised to monitor, assess and evaluate the implementation of the National Programme, the State Commission has conducted two levels of evaluation. In late September 2003, the State Commission submitted a request to the Government and to other competent bodies to provide information on the measures and activities undertaken for implementation of the Programme recommendations. The Government instructed all relevant institutions to report on the implementation status. Subsequently, part of the ministries and other institutions competent for the implementation of the National Programme submitted the requested information. The implementation evaluation contains information which specifies that the competent institutions had focused their activities during the first three months on the preparations of new laws stipulated in the Programme. In this period the drafting of the following laws commenced: Law on the Public Prosecutor’s Office, Law on the Public Attorney’ Office, Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime, Law on Customs Administration, Amendments to the Criminal Code, Amendments to the Law on the Judicial Council of the Republic, Law on Court Budget, Law on the Ombudsman, Law on Criminal Procedure, Law on Public Institutions, Law on Administrative Inspection, Law on Free Access to Public Information, Law on Political Parties, Law on Prevention of Conflicts of Interests, Law on Civil Servants, Law on Associations of Citisens and Foundations, Law on Elections etc. In all these laws, particular attention was dedicated to the implementation of the National Programme.  The Commission assessed that the implementation of the recommendations of the National Programme have largely proceeded within the determined timeframes although a number of institutions have not submitted the requested information,  The second evaluation of the implementation of the National Programme was carried out in June 2004, at the Annual Conference organised by the State Commission. The assessment indicated that the National Programme had been implemented according to the Action Plan. However, the State Commission, together with the members of the working group that prepared the National Programme were assigned with concrete activities to amend the Programme with recommendations for implementation of the already adopted laws and institutional changes. Particular attention was suggested in the amending of the Programme following the recommendations for specific measures for prevention of corruption within the decentralised local self-government.  4. Do specialised anti-corruption services exist? If so, please describe these indicating their legal and institutional status, composition, functions and powers. How is the independence of these services ensured? For the prevention and suppression of corruption in the Republic of Macedonia the following anti-corruption bodies have been founded: 1)  The State Commission for the Prevention of Corruption  The State Commission for the Prevention of Corruption has been established according to the Law on Prevention of Corruption (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 28/02, 46/04 and 83/2004- consolidated text). According to the Law, the State Commission is autonomous and independent in carrying out the activities stipulated by this law. The State Commission in accordance with the Law on Amending the Law on Prevention of Corruption (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04) is a legal entity and has its own budget. A Secretariat has been established within the Commission to carry out the professional, administrative and technical matters, which enhances the autonomy and independence of the State Commission. The State Commission is comprised of seven members, elected from the rank of eminent experts in the field of law and economics and enjoy public reputation in their respective fields. The members of the State Commission are appointed and dissmissed by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia. The current members of the State Commission were appointed by the Assembly on 12.11.2002.  In accordance with the amendments to the Law, the members of the State Commission are appointed on a five-year non-renewable term. During their term, they perform their function professionally, which means that they are employed in the State Commission. This provision does not refer to this term of office, which had started before the adoption of the new Law. The members of the State Commission elect a President among themselves for a one-year non-renewable term. A member of the State Commission may be released of duty before the expiry of his/her term in the following cases: upon his/her request, if he/she has been convicted for a criminal offence to unconditional imprisonment of at least six months, and if he/she has permanently lost the ability to perform the function. According to the Law, the State Commission has wide competencies to achieve the general goal: prevention of corruption in exercing power, public authority, official duty and in politics, prevention of conflict of interests, prevention of corruption while undertaking matters of public interest, as well as prevention of corruption in the private sector. The State Commission has the following competencies:   Adopts a National Programme for Prevention and Repression of Corruption;   Adopts annual programmes and plans for the implementation of the National Programme;   Provides opinion on draft laws of importance for the prevention of corruption;   Raises initiatives before competent bodies for conducting a control over the material and financial operations of political parties, trade unions, and associations of citizens and foundations;   Raises initiatives for conducting procedures before competent bodies for dismissal, reassignment, removal, criminal prosecution or implementation of other measures of accountability of elected or appointed officials, official or responsible persons in public enterprises and other legal persons managing with state capital;    Considers cases, determined by Law, where conflicts of public and private interest have occurred;   Maintains records and monitors the property situation and the changes in the property situation of elected or appointed officials, official or responsible persons in public enterprises and other legal persons managing with state capital;   Co-operates with other state bodies in the prevention of corruption, especially with the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the competent ministries, the Public Revenue Office, Custom Office, Public Prosecutor’s Office, Public Attorney, State Audit Office, the Central Registry, the Central Depository, the Agency for Privatisation, the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering, the Financial Police, and other state and financial institutions. The State Commission, apart from co-operating with institutions in the country, has an active co-operation with the respective national institutions and bodies from other countries (especially with those from the region), as well as with international organisations active in the field of prevention of corruption. One of the crucial tasks of the State Commission identified as the focus of activities in the near future is the training and the education of the institutions responsible for discovering and prosecuting corruption and other types of crimes. In addition, an important task is to inform the public about its activities, to raise public awareness on non acceptance of corruption and about the harmful consequences of corruption in all segments of the society, and especially its negative impact on the economic growth and its contribution to the growth of poverty.  The members of the State Commission are responsible before the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia. For their work, they submit Annual Report to the Assembly. This report is also submitted to the President of the Republic of Macedonia, Government of the Republic of Macedonia, and the mass media. Elected and appointed officials, officials or responsible persons in public enterprises and other legal entities managing with state capital, upon election, appointment, employment or termination of office, have an obligation, in a given time frame, to submit a declaration to the State Commission on their property situation, and on the property situation of the members of their families. During the office term, they are obliged to report to the State Commission any changes in their property, or in the property of the members of his/her family; about their participation in public tenders; use of donations and other foreign aid; acquiring shareholder rights; using state loans, etc.  The State Commission also acts in cases when there are indications that an official or other official or responsible person has brought a discretionary decision as a result of corruption.  In order to carry out its competency in prevention of the so-called electoral corruption, the State Commission informs the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia on the potential misuse of budgetary funds and public funds, as well as funds of public enterprises used during electoral campaigns. In this context, the State Commission has the right to request from competent bodies to carry out control on the funds used for financing a political party or an election candidate in case there are indications of use of illegal funds. The State Commission competency for the prevention of corruption in companies is aimed to preventing monopolistic position on the market; discrimination against other companies or legal entities; distortion of the market and causing damage to other subjects on the market, not resulting from loyal competition.  The prevention of corruption in the companies also includes a prohibition for a company or another legal entity to establish business relations with another company or a legal entity when a conflict of interests occurs. In cases when there is a well founded suspicion based on the data in the annual account and other financial data in the business books of a legal entity, the State Commission has the authority to request the Public Revenue Office to carry out control in the material and financial documents of that legal entity. Acting upon submitted complaints, and in cases when there is a well founded suspicion of committed criminal offence- misuse of public function and corruption, the State Commission may require from authorised institutions to carry out control on the work of the suspected legal entities, as well as to raise an initiative before the Public Prosecutor’ Office for initiating a criminal procedure. For the prevention of corruption in the judiciary, and acting in cases when there are indications or well-founded suspicion for misuse of the office of specific judges, the State Commission submits a request to the Judicial Council of the Republic for determining the liability of those judges. Since its establishment, up to the end of October 2004, the State Commission has raised initiatives on different grounds, such as: 11 initiatives for determining of criminal liability; in 9 cases- considering conflict of interest issues and dismissal; 13 cases- considering the activities of certain state bodies; discretionary rights and determining of liability. In addition, the State Commission has reviewed 7 cases on possible abuse in public procurements, one case regarding protection of person who collaborated with the State Commission and one case each on corruption in judiciary, money laundering, education and politics.  Since November 2002, 926 complaints have been submitted to the State Commission by the citizens, out of which, 266- regarding the state bodies activities; 122- related to privatisation process; 186 -on the judiciary work, 126 -regarding the activities of the public enterprises, health and education sector, 75 –regarding various indications for deviations in the companies, 54 –on irregularities during bankruptcy procedures and 97 other cases. Besides submitted complaints, the State Commission has raised 26 procedures on its own initiative. The State Commission handled 672 cases, out of which 258 are finalised. In 132 complaints the State Commission found it self not competent for further proceedings; in 26 cases after receiving additional information, it determined that there is no ground for further proceedings (no irregularities were found), 67 cases were submitted to the competent bodies for proceedings, and for 21 cases, an initiative for instituting procedures and taking appropriate measures, was raised before competent state bodies. According to the Article 34, paragraph 1, of the Law on Prevention of Corruption, 2.786 property declarations were submitted to the State Commission, including data for property of elected and appointed officials and members of their families, including a certified statement on revoking protection of banking secrecy in regard to all domestic and foreign bank accounts. Furthermore, in accordance with Article 34 of the Law, 81 reports on changes in property situation in a value which exceeds twenty average salaries, were submitted. The total number of persons who submitted property declarations includes all elected and appointed persons who have acquired this status in the period after establishment of the State Commission, as well as, all elected and appointed persons having this status when the Law entered into force, before the State Commission was established. The State Commission submitted to the competent court request for instituting procedure for misdemeanour against 82 persons who failed to submit property declarations. In 13 cases misdemeanour warnings were delivered or the proceedings were terminated. 2)  The Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia – Unit for Fight Organised Crime and Corruption In accordance with Article 106 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, the Public Prosecutor’s Office is a single and autonomous state body. It performs its functions on the basis and within the framework of the Constitution and the law. The Public Prosecutor is appointed and discharged of office by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia for a six-year term. Therefore, the term of office of the Public Prosecutor differs from the one of the members of the Assembly. On the basis of Article 29 of the Law of the Public Prosecutor’s Office (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/04) – a special Unit for Fight Organised Crime and Corruption was established within the Public Prosecutor’s Office. The Unit has competencies to act ex officio in cases of criminal offences committed by an organised group comprised of at least three persons that operates in a given period with the aim of achieving a direct or indirect financial gain or other kind of material gain, and which will commit one or more criminal offences as well as for other criminal offences for which the law stipulates imprisonment of at least four years.  The Unit has responsibility to act before competent courts on the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia. According to the Rulebook on Internal Organisation and Operation of the Public Prosecutor’s Office, the Unit is comprised of at least 10 members - public prosecutors and deputy public prosecutors. The members of the Unit are assigned by the Public Prosecutor of the Republic of Macedonia for a four-year term with a possibility of another assignment.   3)  Ministry of the Interior According to the Action Plan on Police Reform, the Department for Organised Crime has started with its activities from mid of January. It is deemed as one of priorities of the Republic of Macedonia in prevention of organised crime and also in prevention of corruption. The restructuring of the Unit on Organised Crime in a special Department, represent strengthening of this office, which achieved broader structure and units specialised for different types of crime. The assumptions for starting with activities have been created, only after the completion of the internal structure and the adoption of the Rulebook on the Organisation and Operation of the Ministry of the Interior (describing workings tasks and special qualifications for each working post). The activities on combating corruption and serious economic crime are realised in the framework of the Sector for Financial Crime, comprised of Section for Economic Crime and Section for Money Laundering and Corruption. The Sector permanently oversee the situations, movements and forms of economic and financial crime and corruption that occur, and on this base, plans and organises the most appropriate and most efficient measures and activities for warning and combating of such criminal activities. In this framework, the Sector co-operates with other organisational units in the Ministry of the Interior, state bodies, legal entities, police departments from other countries and international associations; makes control over the activities of police departments and provides professional and other assistance in combating economic and financial crime and corruption. It also plans and provides training of inspectors on this issue; participates in drafting regulations, reports and on other expert’s materials and exercises other activities from its domain.(For more details see answer 24_I_07
4) Financial Police The Financial Police as a body within the Ministry of Finance with specific competencies and working agenda for the first time was introduced with the Law on Financial Police (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/02). Besides this, the law enable the strengthening of the already established competencies in the operational activities for discovering financial crimes that cannot be directly substantiated considering the existing evidence. In this context, methods for direct and indirect proving of evidence are used in accordance with the law. This law also sets forth a separation and transfer of the police supervision over financial crime from the Ministry of the Interior to the Ministry of Finance, whereby a specialised team will trace the money proceeding from criminal activities. The Financial Police is a state body within the Ministry of Finances and it exercises its competencies on the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia. The Financial Police is managed by a Director. The Financial Police is comprised of ten financial police officers-economists and lawyers transferred from the Public Revenue Office, the Ministry of the Interior, and the Public Prosecutor’s Office. The Director of the Financial Police is appointed by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and he/she is responsible for his/her work to the Ministry of Finance and the Government. Financial police officers are selected and appointed according to the Rulebook on Examination of the Competencies and Evaluation of the Personal Capacities of the Persons Performing the Work of the Financial Police (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 31/04), which provides the special pre-conditions for appointment.  This law provides the Financial Police with specific authorities for detecting of perpetrators of sophisticated types of crime, tax evasion, money laundering and smuggling. The law also provides specific competence for detecting the following types of criminal offences: illegal trade of goods and products; criminal offences that include evasion of large or significant amounts of taxes and customs duties; and giving legal form to profits deriving from criminal offences. If these crimes can not be  detected directly, with the existing evidence, the Financial Police detects them with application of special methodology for indirect and direct verification of incomes determined by the Law on Financial Police, and proscribed with other regulations in the area of finances.  5)  Public Revenue Office There are separate departments and responsible persons within this state body that have competencies for undertaking anti-corruption measures. The Sector for Inspection Supervision is established within the framework of the General Directorate of the Public Revenue Office. Within the framework of each Regional Directorates (in total 6) of the Public Revenue Office, one person in each is selected to carry out procedures in accordance with the Law on Prevention of Corruption. According to the Rulebook for Internal Organisation and Operation of the Public Revenue Office the Section for Investigations, within the Sector for Inspection Supervision, in the General Directorate, has the responsibility to prepare methodology and instructions for its enforcement and to carry out procedures proscribed by Law where the usual tax procedure (anti-corruption measures) is not proscribed. The Section is also responsible to realise the following measures: organisation of training for investigative techniques and procedures, developing and coordinating of programme for identification and fight against grey economy, and cooperate in that field with the Regional Directorates. The persons subject to declaring assets, on the basis of Article 34 of the Law on Prevention of Corruption, besides to the State Commission for the Prevention of Corruption, have to submit the property declaration to the Section for Investigations. Within the Section, the property declarations are filed, their formal correctness and completeness is checked and a comparison with the submitted applications to the State Commission is performed. Concerning these persons (the submitters) this Section also compares the data from the property declaration with the data from property registers that are kept in the Public Revenue Office. If a discrepancy is found when comparing the data of the property declaration with the data that is kept by the Public Revenue Office, it is considered that the person has submitted incorrect or incomplete data and a procedure for investigating the origin of the material wealth and property is initiated. The procedure for investigating the origin of the assets is carried out in the Regional Directorates of the Public Revenue Office (Skopje, Tetovo, Bitola, Prilep, Strumica, and Štip). For carrying out this procedure in every Regional Directorate, upon the proposal of the Director of the Regional Directorate, the Director of the Public Revenue Office selects one person who is authorised to implement procedures for investigating the origin of the material wealth and property. These persons are autonomous in taking procedural measures (preparation of minutes, hearing of a given person, preparation of notes, evidence gathering and so on) against given persons.  The Public Revenue Office can perform a procedure for investigating the origin of the assets against persons performing duties of public interest, if his/her property and the property of the members of his/her family at the time of performing of the duties have disproportionately increased in relation to his/her income. The Public Revenue Office also carries out a procedure against, a responsible person in a company or other legal entity or a member of body of a legal entity, if in the procedure of supervision of the financial activity of this legal entity, the Public Revenue Office finds irregularities.  After the procedure of investigating the origin of the assets of a given person is carried out, the Public Revenue Office, in accordance with the Law on Prevention of Corruption, prepares a decision for taxation. If it is find out that the assets of that given person have been disproportionately increased, the Public Revenue Office will raise an initiative before the Public Prosecutor’s Office for initiating a procedure. 5. Is corruption defined as a criminal offence in line with the Council of Europe Criminal and Civil Law Convention? Which type of conduct can be sanctioned as corruption? Is active and/or passive bribery sanctioned? In the public and/or private sector? Trading in influence? What kind of sanctions exist (e.g. possibility of confiscation of proceeds, disqualification measures)? The provisions of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04) on receiving a bribe (Article 357) and giving a bribe (Article 358), are harmonised with the Council of Europe Criminal and Civil  Law Convention definitions on Corruption (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 32/99 and “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 32/99) as well as with the Convention on Protection of the European Communities’ Interests and its I and II Protocol.  Article 2 of the Law on Prevention of Corruption (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 28/02, 46/04 and 83/04-consolidated text) defines corruption as abuse of the official position, public authorisation, official duty and position for acquisition of personal gain, or gain for any other person.  The offence of receiving bribe (Article 357) of the Criminal Code is defined as a passive form of corruption  committed by bribing an official or responsible person, i.e. was perpetrated when an official shall request or receive a gift or some other benefit, or receives a promise for a gift or some other benefit, in order to perform an official action within the framework of his/her own official authority which he/she should not perform, or to refrain from an official action which he/she otherwise should perform. Under the Code, the official person, committing this offence shall be punished with imprisonment of one to ten years.  Furthermore, an official who requests or receive a gift or some other benefit, or receive a promise for a gift or some other benefit, in order to perform an official action within the framework of his/her own official authority which he/she should perform, or to refrain from an official action which he/she otherwise should not perform, shall be punished with imprisonment of six months to five years.  An easier form of passive corruption (Article 357, paragraph 3) is the act of the official person who after performing the official duty, request or receive a gift or some other benefit. The prescribed prison sentence in such cases is from three months to three years.  The same penalties are prescribed for the responsible person and person that perform duties of public interest, if the act has been committed in relation with acquiring or cessation of rights determined by law or in order to acquire benefits, or to cause a damage to other; a responsible person in a foreign legal entity; as well as a foreign official that shall commit an offence in order to cause damage to the Republic of Macedonia, its citizen or to a legal entity. (Article 357, paragraph 4)  In all these cases, the received gift or acquired property gains shall be confiscated. The provisions defining the crime of giving a bribe (Article 358) incriminates active corruption, which consists of offering, giving or promising an official or responsible person a gift or other benefit, so that he/she would perform an official action within the framework of his/her official authority which he/she should not perform, or to refrain from an official action which he/she otherwise should perform. The mediation in the realisation of this act is also sanctioned by the law. For all this crimes an imprisonment of six months to five years is prescribed. When the perpetrator is a legal entity, it will be punished with a fine.  According to the Code, a person who offers, gives or promises to an official or responsible person a gift or other benefit, so that he/she would perform an official action within the framework of his/her official authority which he/she must perform, or to refrain form an official act which he/she should not perform, or a person who mediates for, shall be punished with a monetary fine, or with imprisonment of up to three years.  In both cases, the received gift or proceeds shall be confiscated. Beside the distinction between an official person and a responsible person, Articles 357 and 358 of the Criminal Code have introduced a significant novelty. Namely the Code prescribes possible exemption from sanction for the person who has offered, given or has promised a bribe upon a request from an official person, and has reported it, before the act of bribery was detected. In such cases, the presented gift or proceeds shall be returned to the person who has given the bribe.  Aimed at implementing the Law on Prevention of Corruption (Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia, Nos. 28/02; 46/04 and 83/04- consolidated text), the Criminal Code envisages new criminal offences such as: Unconscientious performance of duties (Article 353-v) and Concealing the resources of disproportional acquired property (Article 359-a). In order to increase the preventive measures for protection from illegal acquiring of state owned property, means from Budget and public funds, the Criminal Code in Article 353-v- Unconscientious performance of duties- incriminates the abuse of official position by unconscientious exercise of public duties i.e unconscientious disposal with the entrusted property. Depending on the scope of the acquired proceeds and caused damage, the Law envisages imprisonment from three months to 10 years.  The said prison sentences are also imposed on responsible persons, including those from a foreign legal entity having franchise in Republic of Macedonia, or on a person performing activities of public interest, if the act has been committed in the performance of the special authorities or duties.  In cases when the official or responsible person of a pubic enterprise or a public institution presents false data on his/her incomes, or when it has been found that the property of such persons is significantly beyond his/her legally acquired and taxed income, or that the person conceal the true sources of the income, shall be punished with an imprisonment of six months to five years and a fine. In addition, the disproportionately acquired proceeds shall be confiscated. (Article 359-a) The Law on Prevention of Corruption (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 28/02, 46/04 and 83/04-consolidated text) proscribe the bribery of voters (Article 14). The Law envisages that giving or promising a gift or other benefits for oneself or for other, to voters during elections or referendum, in order to vote or abstain from voting, or to vote in favour of a specific candidate or a specific decision shall be considered as election corruption.  Granting privileges or discriminating after elections is also proscribed (Article 15).The State Commission is authorised to request the competent bodies to undertake appropriate measures and activities within their competencies, if it finds out any privileges or discrimination in regard to the contracts, public procurements and other deals aimed to gain profits, concluded or executed in the period of one year after the completion of any elections.  The Law also forbids exerting influence during election, appointment and discharge from managerial positions (Article 16), when the influence has been exerted by a political party or a person acting on behalf of the political party, meaning that the party i.e. person may not exert any influence on election, appointment or discharge of a person from an official, managerial or other public important position or duty. In addition, the Law envisages that a political party or a person acting on behalf of the political party may not exert influence in respect of employment, assignment to positions and termination of employment relationship of an official person (Article 17).  Furthermore, influence over employing close relatives (Article 30) is also forbidden. Thus, the Law sets forth a prohibition for an elected or appointed official to employ or promote close relatives by exercising influence either over the state body in which he/she is elected or appointed or over other body. The elected or appointed official have the obligation to inform the State Commission about any employment, promotion or appointment or a member of his/her family in a state body, local self-government body, public enterprise or other legal entity managing with state capital.  For all these prohibited activities, the State Commission for Prevention of the Corruption has the obligation to initiate proceedings before the competent bodies for establishing liability. The issue of confiscation of property and proceeds is regulated by the provisions contained in Articles 98-100 of the Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 37/96, 80/99, 4/02, 43/03 and 19/04).  Article 97 of the Criminal Code envisages that no one may retain the direct or indirect property and proceeds acquired through crime. The property and proceeds shall be confiscated trough a court decision, with which the fact of the perpetration of the crime was established. The court may also adopt a decision on confiscation in cases when due to the facts or legal obstacles it is not possible to conduct criminal proceedings against the perpetrator. Under conditions determined by ratified international agreements the confiscated property may be returned to a third country. Under Article 98, the property and proceeds from crime, such as money, movable or immovable objects of value, and other property gain, material and non-material rights shall be confiscated from the perpetrator. If their confiscation is not possible, another property from the perpetrator corresponding to the value of the proceeds from crime shall be confiscated. The confiscation of the property and proceeds may be enforced also from third persons to whom they have been transferred without relevant compensation, if they did not know, but could have known and who were obliged to know that the proceeds have been gained through a crime.  The Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) regulates the procedure for enforcement of the measure  of temporary securing regarding property or proceeds of crimes, such as temporary freezing, seizure, confiscation of funds, banking accounts, financial transactions or criminal proceeds. The enforcement order shall be issued by the court that delivered the judgement in first instance, while the enforcement shall be carried out against property and proceeds designated in the order. If the order can be enforced only partially or not at all, the execution shall be carried out against the remaining property of the person subject to such a measure. No appeal is allowed against the enforcement order, and the compulsory enforcement orders may be stayed only if the person voluntarily returns the property or pays the amount of the proceeds, to an account of the court. Banks and other financial institutions holding the accounts, against which this measure is enforced, have the obligation without any delay, to execute the orders and prevent eventual transfers or financial transactions. The legal acts concluded after the perpetration of the criminal act, with the intention to decrease the value of the property subject to confiscation, are invalid. An appeal is allowed only against the orders for enforcement against the remaining property.  According to Article 29 of the Law on Prevention of Laundering Money and Other Proceeds from Crime (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04) when there are reasonable grounds for suspicion that money laundering or an act of financing of terrorism has been committed, the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering shall file an initiative to the competent Public Prosecutor to raise proposal for enforcement of the securing measure not later than 24 hours, since it has learned that such transaction is under way. Under Article 29, 30, 31 and 32, the competent court shall pass orders for enforcement of securing measures upon the proposal of the Public Prosecutor for imposing such measures. Temporary measures consist of interrupting the transaction and temporary seizure of assets and property, while the entire procedure for ordering such measures would be complete within 72 hours. Such a short period for adopting a decision has been envisaged due to the sensitivity of the measures and their infringing upon the right of clients and their material and other interests, determined by the court, in accordance with the original decision ordering such measures in pre-trial or in a criminal procedure.  6. To what extent and from which sources are statistical data available concerning corruption cases (investigations, cases in court, convictions and sanction level), international co-operation in corruption cases, the link between corruption and organised crime and the link between corruption and money laundering? Under the Law on State Statistics (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 54/97), the State Statistical Office is the principal agency of official statistics in the Republic of Macedonia. According to the Statistical Research Programme for the period 2003-2007, the State Statistical Office is in charge of collection, processing and dissemination of parts of crime statistics data.  Generally, data on crime is kept according to the Classification of Criminal Offences(”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/97), which is a by-law of the Criminal Code adopted in 1996 (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 37/96). According to this Classification, a special class belongs to the criminal offences which have the distinctive features of organised crime, and criminal offences in the area of corruption.  Authorised bodies for maintenance of the statistical data on crimes are the Ministry of the Interior, Ministry of Justice, the courts and the Public Prosecutor’s Office. The modes for maintenance of the statistical data on crime rates differ depending on the bodies in charge of the individual stages of the procedure which maintain the statistical records.  In the Ministry of the Interior, which is in charge of the pre-trial procedure, the statistical data are categorised on the basis of the ‘criminal offence’ indicator; the statistical data in the Public Prosecutor’s Office are categorised on the basis of the ‘person accused of a criminal offence’, while the courts categorise the statistical data on the basis of ‘cases’, which can sometimes comprise either several persons or several criminal offences. The Criminal Code of the Republic of Macedonia includes corruption related criminal offences. Regarding the number of criminal offences subject to criminal charges filed pursuant to these provisions, the statistical data can be obtained from the statistical records of the Ministry of the Interior. These statistical records are maintained on the basis of the legal qualification of the reported criminal offences and for a period of one calendar year. Within the Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia, the statistical records are classified based on ‘persons against whom there are indictments’ for a given criminal offence. According to the mode for maintaining the annual statistical records of the Public Prosecutor’s Office, the cases which are recorded, and which were not finalised are transferred into the next year. Pursuant to the Law on State Statistics (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 54/97), the courts in the Republic of Macedonia, i.e., the basic courts submit a filled questionnaire on a defendant of age, against whom the criminal procedure has been finalised by an effective court verdict. These questionnaires are processed by the State Statistical Office. Pursuant to the Court Rules of Procedure, the courts maintain records on all cases, including those related to corruption, and therefore the data in their original form are obtained from the courtsAfter the end of the calendar year the institutions in charge of maintaining statistical data on crime rates submit the statistical data to the State Statistical Office (SSO), where they are additionally processed in accordance with the accepted nomenclature, which is different from all previously mentioned. These data, after the processing, are published in Statistical Reports. The published data of the SSO also disclose the data on the rate of pronounced verdicts and the types of pronounced sanctions.  The State Commission for Prevention of Corruption, based on its competence, is not required to maintain statistical data upon any grounds, while it records data related to its activities (received property statements from elected and appointed officials; petitions received from citizens and legal entities; initiatives for instituting a procedure before competent bodies).  The data on the international cooperation in corruption cases can be received from the NCB Interpol and the Ministry of the Interior; however an efficient system for regular statistical tracking has not yet been developed. In addition, special statistical records on the interconnectivity of corruption to the organised crime and money laundering do not ex
7. Training: a) How and by whom are relevant staff (anti-corruption prosecutors etc.) trained? b) Which typical “accompanying offences” are covered by the training? (fraud, tax offences and money laundering) a) In the last five years the professional training of judges and prosecutors in the Republic of Macedonia is performed by the Centre for Continuing Education, which operates within the Macedonian Judges Association. The Judicial Reform Strategy foresees institutionalisation of National School for Education of Judges and Prosecutors. One of the special programmes will be the training of the anti-corruption prosecutors. The Centre for Continuous Education of Judges in 2003 organised the following seminars:    Corruption and its Criminal Law Identification,   Fight against Organised Crime, Active and Passive Corruption and Money Laundering. Within the curricula of the Public Prosecutors Association of the Republic of Macedonia, an education seminar was organised in cooperation with the Programme for Development, Assistance and Training for the Public Prosecutor’s Offices in Macedonia (OPDAT) within the USA Embassy, on the topic of Organised Crime, which took place from 11-13.03.2004. In addition, a workshop/seminar was organised for public prosecutors, judges, criminal inspectors, financial police, custom officials and for personnel in the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering on the topic of Investigations and Criminal Prosecution of Offences of Organised Crime, which took place between 8-11.10.2004 in Skopje. One of the more important training programmes was the Council of Europe Octopus Programme against corruption and organised crime with two-year duration (2001-2003), the purpose of which was to introduce the judges and the prosecutors to the contents of the international documents and the EU member-states legislation related to the fight against organised crime and corruption. The training was carried out through regional seminar and study trips.  In terms of education especially important is the implementation of the CARDS 2001 Project, which should commence at the beginning of 2005 as the programmed tasks foresee dealing with the topics related in organised crime and corruption. The implementation of the PACO IMPACT project is under way (Implementation of Anti-Corruption Plans in Southeast Europe), supported by the Swedish Agency for International Cooperation and Development, and implemented through the Council of Europe. The main project partner from the Republic of Macedonia is the State Commission for Prevention of Corruption. A portion of the funds is earmarked for training of prosecutors from the Unit for fight organised crime and corruption, within the Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia. b) Within the already completed trainings there also was training of public prosecutors and personnel from other bodies involved in the fight against corruption. The new forms of crime have been dealt with, with special emphasis on organised and trans-national crime, corruption, cyber-crime, money laundering, financial/commercial crime, terrorism, trafficking in human beings, trafficking in narcotic drugs and unauthorised possession and carrying of weapons and trafficking in weapons. 8. What is done to strengthen the rule of law enforcement bodies in the fight against corruption in general but also to fight corruption internally. Pursuant to the National Programme for Prevention and Suppression of Corruption, and in order to strengthen the state bodies in charge of combating corruption as well as to combat corruption in the state administration itself, the following activities have been undertaken: 1)  Public Prosecutor’s Office  Pursuant to Article 29 of the Law on the Public Prosecutor's Office (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/04) a special Unit for fight organised crime and corruption has been established within the Public Prosecutor’s Office. 2)  Ministry of the Interior In the Department for Organised Crime at the Ministry of the Interior within it Sector for Financial Crime, there is a Section for Money Laundering and Corruption which is in charge of suppressing corruption (see also answer I_E_04). Also important is the establishment of the Sector for Criminal and Intelligence analysis, competent to collect, examine and assess information and data. Analytical information acquired in such a manner enable the execution of police actions as far as the operational plan is concerned, and as regards the strategic plan, facilitate the planning of development, technical, financial and other activities. The Law on Interception of Communication (to be adopted) is expected to reinforce the Ministry’s capacity in combating corruption.  The Ministry of the Interior established a free telephone line in May 2004 (#199) where citizens may report corruption of the Ministry's employees. Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards at the Ministry of the Interior Pursuant to the Rulebook on Systematisation of Posts in the Ministry of the Interior, a Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards has been established to carry out particular expert matters for the police and criminal police. The Sector (SICPS) has a duty to investigate cases of abuse of official position and authority as well as corruption of employees in the Ministry of the Interior. There are activities under way for establishment of two units within the SICPS:    Criminal Affairs Unit   Unit for Submissions, Complaints, Legal Conduct and Application of Authorities. The work and conduct of the Sector has been regulated by the Rulebook on the Performance of Duties of the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards within the Ministry of the Interior. Pursuant to the Rulebook, the Sector conducts investigation on the basis of data, information and indications received by employees in the Ministry, and on the basis of submissions of citizens related to illegal and unprofessional conduct of the Ministry's employees. The Sector may also launch an investigation upon the proposal of the Minister of the Interior. Investigations related to illegal and unprofessional conduct of employees are carried out by 21 authorised inspectors, while inspections related to illegal and unprofessional conduct of employees in the internal affairs sectors and units are carried out by eight detached authorised officers in the seats of regional internal affairs sectors and units. The outcome of such investigation and inspection is presented in a final report submitted to the head of sector or to the Minister of the Interior. In the event of a well-founded suspicion of a crime, the sector or the organisational unit which has been given the investigation results files a criminal charge to the Basic Public Prosecutor’s Office. In accordance with the Law on Internal Affairs and the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior, a decision is rendered for a temporary removal of the employee from his/her post and the employee is further subject to a procedure of termination of employment. In the event that employees have been suspected of corruption, yet such suspicions have not been supported by material evidence, they are reassigned to another post. The Sector is fully independent in its operations and in launching investigations on whatever grounds. The Sector exclusively answers to the Minister for its work. 3)  Public Revenue Office For the purpose of reducing the risk of abuse of official duty in the process of granting tax reliefes and exemptions (i.e. the reduction of the discretionary rights of tax officers) the Public Revenue Office has been subject to reinforced internal control. Hence, a Sector for Internal Control was established in 2002 which in 2004 became a Sector for Internal Audit. The Unit for Audit and Harmonisation of the Systems of Internal Control within this Sector, inter alia, carries out conformity assessment regarding the enforcement of laws, by-laws and internal acts that are in force, as well as procedural control related to complaints against the conduct and work of tax officers. Additionally, a free direct telephone line has been established (#198) for reporting an abuse of official duty of employees in the Office, as well as for reporting tax evasion and non-issuance of fiscal bills. 4)  Customs Administration In the interest of securing the integrity of customs officers and preventing corruption, a new function within the Customs Administration has been introduced in 2003 falling under the competence of the Sector for Professional Standards, which comprises the Internal Inspection Unit and the Internal Investigation Unit. The staffing of the Sector started in May 2003 when the Internal Investigation Unit was formed, while the Internal Inspection Unit is in the process of forming. The Sector for Professional Standards has a mission to act preventively and detect and eliminate unprofessional conduct, fraud, losses, abuses, corruption and miss-governance, i.e. all deviant phenomena in professional conduct as stipulated in Article 123 of the Collective Agreement on Labour Relations No. 01-1984/1 adopted on 17.03.2003 at the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia. The Sector exerts control over all functions in the Customs Administration sectors and customs houses regarding their lawful conduct and adherence to prescribed procedures, competence, tasks, rights and liabilities. In addition, the Sector investigates allegations on unlawful operations by employees (uniformed personnel, authorised persons, persons with a status of civil servants and persons without the status of civil servants).  In June 2003 and in August and September 2004 the advisory team of the US Customs Service SECI conducted special training for the staff of the Sector for Professional Standards.  Regarding the foregoing, the Sector for Professional Standards collects information on unlawful conduct of customs officers through the On-duty Operational Centre (the open telephone line #197 that started operating on 26.11.2003); collects information from the Sector for Control and Investigation; uses various techniques of surveillance and shadowing in accordance with law; and develops confidential contacts with participant subjects in the customs procedure. The Sector for Professional Standards prepares official reports on the basis of objectively collected facts and evidence (official notes for internal use and official information for communication with the director and for further processing the case to the Disciplinary Commission), which serve as support to allegations on a customs offence. In the course of the procedure, the Sector takes account of the moral integrity of the customs officer and his/her human rights.  The Internal Investigation Unit of the Sector for Professional Standards from 01.07.2003 to 30.09.2004 instituted the following procedures: Skopje Customs House   A total of 27 procedures have been instituted of which 26 have been completed and the remaining one is under way; Kumanovo Customs House   A total of 30 procedures have been instituted of which 29 have been completed and the remaining one is under way; Štip Customs House   A total of 15 procedures have been initiated and completed; Gevgelija Customs House   A total of 20 procedures have been initiated and completed; Bitola Customs House:   A total of 32 procedures have been initiated and completed. At the level of the Customs Administration in the Republic of Macedonia a total of 124 procedures have been instituted, of which 122 have been completed and 2 are under way.   In the context of the above, the Sector for Professional Standards exerts its independence through objectively collected facts and evidence regarding allegations of a customs offence, without taking part in the further procedure, i.e. without participating in the work and the relevant decision-making of the Disciplinary Commission. The Sector for Professional Liability is under direct jurisdiction of the Customs Administration Director. For the purpose of preventing corruption, the Customs Administration has introduced an official ID as an additional part to the official uniform. The customs officer is obliged to keep his/her official ID at all times so as he/she may be identified in the event of improper performance of duty or misconduct. Especially important for the strengthening of the institutions that enforce the rule of law in combating corruption is the training on corruption of judges and public prosecutors, carried out by the Centre for Continuous Education of Judges and Public Prosecutors within the Judges Association (in the framework of the national and regional CARDS Programme, the Council of Europe projects, etc.). For more detail on training of judges and public prosecutors, please see answer I_E_07
9. Public offices: is equal access guaranteed to all citizens? Do regulations exist which are objective and founded on merit-based criteria (in terms of adequate salaries, social rights, rotation in sensitive posts, financial disclosure obligations during office)? How are such rules reconciled with the principle of equitable representation? The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) in Article 32, paragraph 2 stipulates the right to work and free choice of employment under equal conditions as one of the basic human and civil rights and freedoms. This Constitutional principle has been applied through two basic legal acts that govern the manner of employment of public and civil servants.  Equal access to jobs and selection based on qualifications are the two main principles for employment of civil servants, determined by the Law on Civil Servants (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, 17/04 and 69/04). For more details on the conditions of employment of civil servants see answer I_C_06.  The ways and procedures of employment of public servants that do not have a status of civil servants have been regulated by the Law on Labour Relations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 80/93, 3/94, 14/95, 53/97, 59/97, 21/98, 25/00, 34/00, 50/01, 25/03 40/03 and 80/03- consolidated text).  The Law on Labour Relations in Article 9 emphasises the principle of equal access to every working position for each citizen in general, including the public service, providing that the employer may not put a person seeking employment  or an employee in an unequal position on grounds of his/her race, gender, age, health condition, i.e. disability, religious, political or other belief, trade union membership, ethnic or social background, family status, property status or other similar state of affairs. (For more details see answer I_C_06). Chapter IV of the Law on Civil Servants regulates the civil servants’ system of salaries and salary supplements (for more details see answer I_C_06Because a single regulation of the salary system for public servants that do not have a status of civil servants does not exist, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Trade Union of the Republic of Macedonia, as its social partner, signed in December 2002 a social agreement committing themselves to take action towards drafting a regulation for establishment of a public sector salary system. As a result of this commitment, the drafting of a law for the regulation of the salaries of public sector employees is currently underway. The solutions offered by this Law shall correspond with the solutions on salaries determined by the Law on Civil Servants. Social rights, such as the right of daily, weekly and annual paid leave, salary during national holidays and professional training, the right of health care insurance - have been provided for the public servants with the Law on Civil Servants, Law on Labour Relations and the General Labour Agreement for Public Services, Public Enterprises, State Bodies, Local Self-Government Bodies and Other Legal Entities Performing Non-Economic Activity (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.39/94 and 73/2001). The criteria for the length of the annual leave have been determined with the General Labour Agreement and are related to the length of the working experience, complexity of the working tasks at a specific working position, working conditions and the employee’s health condition. The Constitutional base for these rights and their regulation by law and labour agreement has been determined in Article 32 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia. No additional rights have been stipulated for public service employees in terms of implementation of the indicated rights and, in this regard, they are equal with other employees. Civil, as well as public servants are entitled to a salary supplement for work in special conditions: night work, work in shifts, work under high life-endangering risks, work during weekly leaves or holidays, and over-time work.  Taking into account the particularities of the work and the working assignments the difficulties and specific working conditions, as well as their effect on the employees’ working capacity, the Law on Defence (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 42/01), Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 13/03 and 33/03) and Law on the Execution of Sanctions (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.3/97 and 23/99), Chapter IV of the Law on Pension and Disability Insurance (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.80/93, 3/94,14/95, 71/96, 32/97, 24/00, 96/00, 05/01 and 50/01) provide the right of increased duration of service insurance, appropriate reduction of the age limit for exercising the right of pension and a special pension calculation method for the employees at certain positions in the defence, internal affairs and the penitentiaries. Posts affected by these additional rights shall be determined by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia upon a proposal of the Ministers of Defence, Interior and Justice. Rotation of sensitive posts has not largely been introduced as a method for prevention of corruption. However, initial efforts have been made in some state administration bodies. For example, the Ministry of Defence introduced the obligatory rotation of the working posts for the members of the Public Procurement Commission. The obligation to report on the property situation while in office is a highly significant and sensitive segment in the preventive set of measures and one of the most important issues regulated by the Law on Prevention of Corruption (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 28/02, 46/04 and 83/2004-consolidated text). The Law regulates in details the ways and procedures of reporting on the overall property. By reporting on one's property, an image is created on the current property situation of a person taking the office and a monitoring is enabled until the moment of termination of the office. The article 34 of the Law on Prevention  of Corruption (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.83/2004) sets forth that an elected or appointed official, responsible person in a public enterprise, public institution or other legal entity managing with state capital, or an official, upon election, appointment, employment or taking an office, fills a property declaration with detailed description of the real estate, movables of substantial value, securities, claims and debts, as well as other property owned  by members of his/her family. Persons indicated in Paragraph 1 of this Article are obliged to fill a property declaration within 30 days from the day after termination of the office, i.e. termination of the employment. In the Law’s basic text, adopted in 2002, this obligation referred only to elected or appointed persons. However, the amendments to the Law on Prevention of Corruption of April 2004 (Official Gazette of the  Republic of Macedonia, No. 46/04) have introduced an obligation for property declaration for all officials in the state administration.  The constitutional principle of equitable representation has been implemented in many laws. When recruitng is concerned, this principle applies if not contravening the criteria on expertise and competence.  
10. Is integrity, accountability and transparency of public administration assured, e.g. by means of quality management tools, auditing and monitoring of standards such as the Common Assessment Framework of EU Heads of Public Administration? The principle of legality within the state administration has been defined as a constitutional principle in the Republic of Macedonia. Article 96 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) prescribes that state administrative bodies perform the functions within their sphere of competence autonomously and on the basis and within the framework of the Constitution and laws. The principle of legality has also been determined as a basic principle in the Law on Organisation and Operation of State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02). which in Article 3 prescribes that state administration bodies carry out their competences as determined by law in accordance with principles of legality, accountability, efficiency, effectiveness, transparency, equity and predictability  From a normative aspect, the principles of integrity, accountability and transparency of the state administration have been incorporated into several laws as explicit provisions.  The Law on Civil Servants (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, 17/04, and 69/04), in its Article 2 determines that civil servants carry out their official duties in accordance with the Constitution and law, in a professional, politically neutral and impartial manner. The professional integrity has been supported by principles of impartiality and autonomy in decision-making, free assessment of evidence and protection of citizens’ rights and public interest, as determined by the Law on General Administrative Procedure (“Official Gazette of SFRY” Nos. 52/56, 10/65, 18/65 - consolidated text, 4/77, 11/78, 32/78 - consolidated text, 9/86, 16/86, 47/86 -consolidated text and “Official Gazette of the RM”, Nos. 44/02)  In terms of implementation of principles of openness and transparency as well as citizens’ participation, the Law on Organisation and Operation of State Administrative Bodies prescribes that the public is informed and consulted in preparation of laws and other regulations. As for the administration's transparency, it has been a long practice in the Republic of Macedonia that the administration offers explanation on an administrative act or decision. Law on General Administrative Procedure contains detailed provisions on the content of the explanation as an integral part of every decision. (for more details see also answer I_C_09The responsibility of the state administration and public services, institutions, public enterprises and natural and legal persons that have been given public authorities, has also been implemented through legal mechanisms of supervision by the executive government, higher administrative bodies, courts, the Ombudsman and state and internal auditors. The Law on Prevention of Corruption contains provisions defining the principles of legality (Article 3), confidentiality (article 4), equality (article 5), transparency (article 7) and accountability (article 7) of the public administration. Pursuant to the Law, and within its competences, the State Commission for the Prevention of Corruption undertakes activities aimed at control and supervision of the public administration and the mode of exercising of discretionary rights.   The control mechanisms and forms of accountability create conditions for eliminating or reducing the possibility of abuse of official duty for personal gains, and they strengthen the responsibility for the legal and conscientious execution of duties. The Law on Civil Servants contains special provisions on disciplinary and material responsibility of civil servants. The internal audit as an important control tool in a given institution, including financial and legal audit of execution of duties, is important for the efficiency and quality in operation, for the process of decision-making and for the prevention of irregularity and abuse of the position (Law on Internal Audit – “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 69/04). Given that the Law entered into force in October 2004, there is insufficiency of by-laws that would precisely define the standards and procedures. Albeit measures on promotion of the foregoing principles have been envisaged through expert training of civil servants as well as through the annual process of evaluation of their work (that shall be conducted in 2005 for the first time), more thorough activities on introducing instruments for quality administration, audit and supervision of the standards such as the Common Assessment Framework of EU Heads of Public Administration have not been undertaken within the administration as those standards have still not been introduced in the Republic of Macedonia. 11. Do precise codes of conduct exist, which indicate what is and what is not allowed, and which are subject to a permanent monitoring process? Ethical standards are defined in detail in codes of conduct in several areas. The Code of Conduct for Civil Servants (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 96/01 and 16/04) was adopted in December 2001, regulating civil servant’s conduct  and work in order to ensure adherence to the principles of legality, professional integrity, efficiency, and loyalty in carrying out their official duties. In order to observe the elementary principles and recommendations contained in the European Code of Police Ethics, the Code of Police Ethics (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 3/04) was adopted in January 2004. The Code regulates the behaviour, work and objectives of the police; the legal grounds for police operation; the relation of the police and criminal judiciary bodies; police organisation; the qualifications; the process of selection; police employment and training; the rights of police employees; police interventions; police accountability and monitoring; police research; and international cooperation. In 1998, the Minister of Justice, pursuant to the provisions of the Law on Execution of Sanctions (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 3/97, 23/99 and 74/04), has adopted the Code of Conduct for Officials Working in Penitentiary and Correctional Facilities, establishing that employees must act in accordance with the Constitution, law and other regulations in the field of execution of sanctions, conscientiously, responsibly and justly, without bias to convicts and detainees. In carrying out their duties, tax officers must adhere to the principles established in the Code of Conduct for Tax Officers, adopted by the director of the Public Revenue Office in 2000, relating to the obligation of the tax officer to carry out their duty objectively, timely, honestly and in accordance with law, without abusing their official position to obtain property or other gain. In performing their work and duties, employees of the Customs Administration act in compliance with the custom regulations and the Customs Code, stipulating a standard and unified approach to each party, without preference, taking bribe and abuse of official position. In 1992, the Medical Chamber of the Republic of Macedonia, taking the Hippocratic Oath as the basic ethical principle of the medical profession and its humane dimension, adopted the Code of Medical Deontology;  In the field of education, every primary and secondary school, adopts a code of teacher and student conduct. In field of the judiciary, the following codes of conduct have been adopted:    Code of Judicial Ethics, adopted by the Macedonian Judges Association;    Code of Public Prosecutors Ethics, adopted by the Public Prosecutors Association; and    Code of Professional Ethics for Lawyers, Expert Associates, Associates and Trainees, adopted by the Bar Association. 
12. Whistle-blowing – do clear rules and reporting mechanisms exist in both the public and the private sectors? With the adoption of the Law on Ratification of the Civil Law Convention Against Corruption (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 13/02), in accordance with Article 9 of this Convention, the Republic of Macedonia undertook a commitment to provide in its legislation appropriate protection against any unjustified sanction for employees reporting acts of corruption. The Law on Prevention of Corruption (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 28/02, 46/04 and 83/04-consolidated text) contains several provisions serving to protect any citizen or official reporting a punishable act. One of the provisions is contained in Article 5, which stipulates that anyone is entitled to prevent or report, without any consequence to himself/herself, an act that represents misuse of office, public authorisations, official duty and position, whereby personal gain is obtained or another person is harmed.  Article 18 provides for the possibility that twenty Representatives of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia may pose a question for establishing accountability for corruption involving elected or appointed high-ranking officials, authorised officials, responsible persons in public enterprises and other legal entities managing state capital. According to Article 19, upon the request of the State Commission for the Prevention of Corruption, the person obliged to keep a state, military or another official secret may be relieved of such duty due to engagement in a criminal or another procedure for an act of corruption.  Article 44 prescribes the obligation to report a corruption related punishable act. The right of citizens and legal entities to lodge a complaint to the State Commission in the event of abuse of discretionary rights has been provided for (Article 46), whereas Article 47 obliges the elected and appointed high-ranking official to report an offer of bribe. The Law on Prevention of Corruption also regulates the issue of protection of collaborators of justice and witnesses. In accordance with this law, a person who has reported data pointing to the occurrence of corruption cannot be criminally prosecuted or otherwise held accountable, whereas a person who has given a statement or who has testified in a procedure for corruption is provided with protection in accordance with law. The person is entitled to compensation for the damages that may be suffered by them or a member of their family due to the given statement or testifying (Article 20). Furthermore, the law provides protection of persons working on the suppression of corruption by stipulating that the persons working in the bodies for detecting and suppressing corruption are ensured full protection and independence for the efficient performance of their authorisations and duties, and that they must not be subjected to pressure in their work or in taking specific actions. The persons notify the State Commission of any exerted pressure in their work or in their taking specific actions, and regarding the pressure on the members of the State Commission in their work or in their taking specific actions the State Commission notifies the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 21). 13. Which measures are taken to raise awareness of corruption as a serious criminal offence (e.g. campaigns, media and training)? Does the law contain provisions designed to prevent corruption? Raising Awareness on Corruption The Government and other state authorities, as well as the State Commission for the Prevention of Corruption undertake measures for raising awareness on the corruption as a serious crime. The civil sector is also involved.  On 04.05.2004 the Ministry of the Interior has established an open free telephone line (#199) for reporting corruption of Ministry’s officials, which has been advertised both in print and electronic media. As of the establishment of this line there have been over 541 calls and all have been examined. Within the Surveillance over Criminal Procedures on Acts of Corruption Project, the Ministry of the Interior and Transparency Macedonia have signed an Agreement on Cooperation in 2003 as well as a Statement of Confidence. In 2004, the Customs Administration has carried out the project titled Do you have something to report? Within the project a free telephone line has been opened (#197) enabling citizens to report smuggling, corruption and embezzlement in the operations of the Customs Administration. An intensive public campaign in the print and electronic media has been carried out for the encouragement of citizens to report any such activities of the Customs Administration.  Similary, the Public Revenue Office has established a free direct telephone line (#198) for reporting the abuse of official duty, tax evasion or non-issuance of fiscal bills. The Ministry of Justice within the Strengthening Responsibility Project has signed a Co-operation Memorandum with Transparency Macedonia on 18.07.2003 on the joint drafting of the Law on Access to Public Information and the Law on Conflict of Interests.  In addition, the non-governmental sector undertakes a number of measures aimed at the further raising of the public awareness for the hazards from corruption. These measures have been aimed at the efficient public involvement into anticorruption activities, by encouraging public reactions on the decisions of executive and legislative authorities as well as through the monitoring of the court authority. Most of these activities have been realised by Transparency Macedonia (a non-governmental organisation), in co-operation with other non-governmental organisations (the Association of Journalists in Macedonia, Forum Strategic Research and Documentation Centre Macedonia, Macedonian Centre for International Co-operation, Open Society Institute-Macedonia, etc., competent state authorities and international organisations and institutions.  Several books and brochures on corruption have been hitherto published. In addition, researches have been conducted in the field of corruption tackling issues on the access to official information, conflict of interests, etc.   One of the more significant initiatives of the civil society has been the establishment of the coalition “Macedonia without Corruption”, comprising 75 active non-governmental organisations. In general, the objectives of this project have been fulfilled. Many of the non-governmental organisations have started preparing independent projects in the field of corruption and hold round tables and workshops on a regular basis in the cities where they operate. In addition, the Local Anti-Corruption Co-operation project was realised concurrently with the above initiative. In the course of 2003 and 2004 employees in competent state institutions have been more closely informed upon the forms of corruption and how to identify it in terms of legal aspects. Thus joint seminars by the State Commission for the Prevention of Corruption and the Public Prosecutor's Office have been organised as well as a number of seminars on organised crime and on the necessity of reforms of the judiciary, the public prosecution service, the penitentiary system, the public attorney, BAR and notary service.  Legal Provisions on the prevention of corruption  Apart the organic Law on Prevention of Corruption (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 28/02, 46/04 and 83/04 - consolidated text), there are provisions on the prevention of corruptive conduct, conflicts of interests and incompatibility of posts in the Constitution and in a number of sectoral laws and by-laws. Below are some examples of such constitutional and legal provisions.  The Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia“, Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03in Article 63, paragraph 5 prescribes that holding other public offices is incompatible with the office of a Representative of the Assembly, which is subject to regulation by a separate law. Article 83, paragraph 1 of the Constitution stipulates that the duty of the President of the Republic of Macedonia is incompatible with the performance of any other public office, profession or position in a political party. As regards provisions related to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, Article 89, paragraph 5 determines that the office of Prime Minister and that of a Minister is incompatible with performance of any other public office or profession. The Constitution also lays down provisions on the incompatibility of performing a judge’s office with other public office, profession or membership of a political party (Article 100, paragraph 3); the incompatibility of the office of a member of the Judicial Council of the Republic with the performance of other public offices, professions or membership of political parties (Article 104, paragraph 5); the incompatibility of the office of the Public Prosecutor with the performance of any other public office, profession or membership of a political party (Article 107, paragraph 3); and the incompatibility of the office of a judge of the Constitutional Court with the performance of other public office, profession or membership of a political party (Article 111, paragraph 1). Law on Election of Representatives in the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 42/02, 50/02 and 46/04)) in Article 6 determines the incompatibility of the office of an MP with the performance of other public offices and professions. Thus, paragraph 1 of the same Article determines that the office of an MP is incompatible with the office of the President of the Republic, Prime Minister or Minister, a judge in the Constitutional Court of Macedonia, a Judge, Public Prosecutor, Ombudsman and other offices elected or appointed by the Assembly and the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. Paragraph 2 stipulates that the office of an MP is incompatible with the office of the Mayor or Council member of the City of Skopje. Paragraph 3 determines that the office of an MP is incompatible with the performance of expert and administrative duties in state administrative bodies. Pursuant to paragraph 4, the MP office is incompatible with performing an economic or any other profit activity. Paragraph 5 determines that the MP office is also incompatible with membership in steering committees  of public enterprises, public institutions, funds, agencies, institutes and other legal entities, as well as with an appointment to represent state or public capital in trade companies. The Law on Local Self-Government (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 5/02) contains provisions stipulating that the municipal mayor during his/her term of office may not perform any other profession (Article 52, paragraph 3). The Law also contains a separate Article (53) defining the conflict of interests of the mayor: he/she may not be appointed as a member in supervisory, management or control bodies in trade companies and public services and may not participate in the process of decision-making on issues for which he/she personally or members of his/her family (spouse, children or second-degree relatives) have a financial or any other interest. A similar provision on the conflict of interests relates to the members of the municipal council (Article 44). They may not participate in the process of decision-making on issues for which they personally or their spouses, children or second-degree relatives have financial or other interests, nor they may make decisions related to municipal public services if they are employed in these services. In addition, the council member may not be employed in the municipal administration of the municipality in which elected. The Law on the Ombudsman (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/03) specifies that the office of the Ombudsman is incompatible with the performance of another public office and profession or with membership of a political party (Article 8). The Law on the Public Prosecutor’s Office (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/04) determines that the public prosecutor and his/her deputy may not perform duties incompatible with their office (Article 49, paragraph 2). The office of the public prosecutor or a deputy public prosecutor is incompatible with the office of an MP, a member of a municipal council and the City of Skopje, and with other offices in the state administration, local-self government and the City of Skopje, as well as with performance of other public office or membership of a political party (Article 50). The performance of any other public office and profession may be grounds for dismissal of the public prosecutor or/and his/her deputy. As regards the prevention of corruption, Article 44 of the Law determines that a public prosecutor may not be a person whose spouse, first-degree or collateral relative to a second degree is a public prosecutor or a deputy public prosecutor in the same or higher public prosecutor’s office covering the same region or in the Public Prosecutor's Office of the Republic of Macedonia. At the same time, Article 51 specifies that the public prosecutor and his/her deputies may not receive gifts or use services offered by parties that have a direct or indirect interest in the procedure of the public prosecutor’s office.  The Law on Civil Servants (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, 17/04, and 69/04) in Article 18 stipulates that the civil servant is obliged to perform his/her duties professionally, conscientiously, efficiently, carefully and in a timely manner, in accordance with the Constitution and law. Paragraph 2 underlines that the civil servant is obliged to perform his/her duty impartially and without the influence of political parties. Moreover, the civil servant may not be guided by his or her political convictions or personal financial interests and may not abuse competences and the status he/she has been given as a civil servant.  Article 68, paragraph 1, item 10 of the Law on Civil Servants sanctions the receipt of gifts or other benefits and defines it as disciplinary violation.  The Civil Servants Code of Ethics (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 96/01 and 16/04) contains provisions related to the prevention of conflict of interests. Therefore, Article 3, paragraph 2 of this Code determines that the civil servant may not be guided by a wrong, unjustified or unreasonable factual situation in decision-making as a result of conflict of interests. Article 5 regulates the use of authorities and status of a civil servant and prescribes that he/she is obliged to avoid any type of conflict of interests as well as situations that may lead to suspicion in conflict of interests. Article 8 specifies that the civil servant may not allow his/her personal financial interest to come into conflict with his/her position and status as a civil servant. The term financial interest does not only denote personal gains of the civil servant, but also gains of his/her family, relatives, friends, or natural and legal persons with whom he/she has conducted business. In addition, the civil servant may not accept co-operation with persons or organisations that have had business interests with the administrative body in which the civil servant is employed. Article 9 of the Code (which further elaborates Article 68 of the Law on Civil Servants) specifies that the civil servant may not request or accept gifts, services, aid or any other benefit that may corrupt his/her professional conduct. Article 10 prescribes that the civil servant is obliged to use state funds cost-effectively. For more details on provisions pertaining to the status of civil servants, their independence, recruitment, career structures and rewarding, which are important prerequisites for the prevention of corruption, see answer I_C_06.  The Law on Internal Affairs (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos.19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 13/03, 33/03 and 19/04) envisages that employees with special duties and authorities in the Ministry of the Interior may not perform activities that are incompatible with their duties. The Police Ethics Code (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 3/04), adopted pursuant to the Law on Internal Affairs, contains provisions for the prevention of corruption. Thus, Article 21, paragraph 2 determines that police members may not be placed in financial or any other dependence on other persons or bodies. In addition, police members may not use official authorities to gain personal profits (paragraph 3). The Customs Administration Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04) contains provisions regulating the performance of additional activities by customs officers (Article 60), which in particular stipulate that customs officers may not perform any other duty or activity related to gaining profits and which is in breach of their official duty or activity. They may not be members or partners in trade companies or members in management or supervisory boards of trade companies. Additionally, customs officers may not be guided by personal financial interests; may not abuse authorities and their position in performance of duties; may not use privileges and exemptions; nor they may accept material or other gains in the line of duty. They are obliged to act in accordance with the Code of Conduct of the Customs Administration. Article 1 of the aforementioned Law on Prevention of Corruption specifies that the law stipulates measures on prevention of corruption in exercising power, public authority, anti-corruption measures against legal entities in their performance of activities of public interest as well as prevention of corruption in the private sector..  Provisions in this Law also determine measures against conflict of interests. Chapter III of this Law related to prevention of corruption in the line of duty contains several provisions determining the prohibited activities of elected or appointed officials, official or responsible persons in public enterprises and other legal entities managing with state capital in the course of their duties. The provisions in this Chapter also specify that appointed or elected officials, or responsible persons in public enterprises are prohibited to perform duties incompatible with their office.  Article 30 proscribes the acceptance of gifts.  Another important obligation stipulated by the Law concerning the prevention of corruption is the obligation of an elected or appointed official or an official person in a public enterprise, institution or another legal entity managing state capital to report his/her property or the property of his/her family. This obligation also applies in the event of changes in property status.  Article 28 specifies that an elected or appointed official or another official person who within three years from the cessation of his/her term of office founds a trade company, or conducts a for-profit business activity in relation to his/her previous post, must notify the State Commission.  Provisions that essentially relate to anti-corruption are those in Article 29 (prohibition of acquiring shareholder rights); Article 30 (prohibition of influencing decisions regarding employment of close relatives); Article 33 (abuse of public procurement procedures) as well as in other articles. The prevention of conflict of interests has especially been regulated in Chapter IV providing several articles that regulate the legality of performance of an elected or appointed official, an official or responsible person in a public enterprise, as well as any legal entity managing with state capital. Thus, it has been clearly prescribed that when a conflict of interests exists between the public and personal interest, the responsible person is bound to act in accordance with the public interest; whereby it is considered that a conflict between the personal and the public interest exists when the performance between an official and other action affects the financial or other interests of persons subjects to this Law or interests of their family members. In the event of circumstances implying conflict of interests or if doubts have been raised over the impartiality in decision-making or in the course of undertaking a certain official and other action(s), the official person is excluded from the performance of the respective action(s). In addition, the Law prescribes that if a superior gives an unlawful order, the official person must notify the administrative bodies or the State Commission for the Prevention of Corruption lest the superior continues to give such orders after he/she has been warned by his/her subordinate. Pursuant to the Law, every bearer of public office, an official person or responsible person in a public enterprise, institution or other legal entity managing with state capital, must report a corruption-related crime.  The provisions of this Law also prohibit any form of influence. If these prohibitions have been violated, each citizen disposing of such information is obliged to notify the State Commission.  Grounds for filing a submission to the State Commission may also be a reasonable doubt that in the course of execution of a discretionary authority the decision has been brought due to corruption. With regard to anti-corruption measures, the Law prescribes that any bribe offers must be reported. In the event of corruption charges, the person charged notifies the administrative body which has elected or appointed him/her without delay as well as his/her superior and the State Commission. The Law also determines that any legal matters or particular decisions that have been adopted as a result of corruption are not legally valid, .i.e. they are considered null and void. A party that has been injured as a result of corruption is entitled to indemnityLaw on Associations of Citizens and Foundations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 31/98) also contains provisions related to conflict of interests. Thus, pursuant to this Law, associations of citizens and foundations may not perform political activities or use their property and assets for the accomplishment of political goals (Article 3). In case of a violation of this provision the association of citizens or foundation is terminated (Article 56).  For more details on the provisions pertaining to prevention of corruption in politics see answer I_E_05
14. Are there clear and transparent rules on financing of political parties, social partners and other interest groups? Are these entities subjected to external financial control in order to avoid conflicts of interest between their representatives, public officials and the private sector? Article 20, paragraph 1 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia“, Nos. 52/91, 01/92, 31/98, 91/01 and 84/03) guarantees the freedom of association of citizens to exercise and protect their political, economic, social, cultural and other rights and convictions. According to the constitutional concept, political parties are citizens’ associations and their funding is carried out within political activities. The Law on  Financing of Political Parties adopted by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia in October 2004 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 76/04) regulates the modes and procedures for obtaining financial recourses and disposing of them for current operations and activities. The Law also regulates the modes of the financial and material control of political parties. The financing of political parties is public and transparent, and they are provided by public and private sources.  The public sources of financing are funds from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia, municipality budgets and the Skopje City budget. The Law prescribes that the total amount for the annual financing of political parties shall be 0.06% of the total original revenues of the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia. They may only be used for the party’s goals as prescribed by the laws, statutes and other regulations of the political party. Up to 30% of the funds for the political parties secured from the central budget are allocated evenly to parliamentary and non-parliamentary political parties that have won at least 1% of the votes at the last parliamentary elections in the Republic of Macedonia or at the last local elections in the local self government unit.  Up to 70% of the funds for political parties from the central budget are allocated to parties whose candidates have been elected MPs in the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, proportionally to the number of their MPs. The same applies to political parties whose candidates have been elected as mayors and councillors in municipalities, proportionally to the number of their councillors. The funds are allocated every three months, upon Guidelines adopted by the Minister of Finance. Private sources for financing of the political parties comprise membership fees, donations, gifts, contributions, subsidies, sponsorships, endowments, sale of promotional and propaganda materials and individual incomes. The membership fee amount for a period of one year, for each member, may not exceed the average wage of the preceding year. The political parties may receive donations in a form of money, material funds or services. They may also receive non-monetary donations if, according to the statute, they can be used for the party’s activities. The total amount of every single donation may not exceed 200 average wages when coming from legal entities, and 100 average wages when coming from an individual in Macedonia, where the average wage is the one paid in the month prior to the donation. This amount may not be accumulated more than once a year. The political parties maintain a Register on donations including data on every donor's name, type and value of donations and date of granting. The political parties are required to publicise the register of donations. The political parties may not conduct business and may not acquire incomes other than those from deposit interests, leasing the party’s premises, incomes from sale of print, audio-visual and digital publications and propaganda materials, and incomes from sale of tickets for party events.  The political parties may not receive funds from: foreign governments; international institutions; bodies and organisations of foreign states and other foreign persons; state and local bodies other than budgetary funds (except funds as stipulated in the election laws); public enterprises, public institutions, funds and other legal entities managing with state capital; public enterprises, public institutions and public funds founded by municipalities; enterprises with at least 20% state capital; public institutions including those in the process of privatisation; private enterprises which at the moment of donating funds for the political party carry out public services on behalf of state bodies or institutions, enterprises and funds by way of agreement; associations of citizens and religious communities; enterprises with mixed capital funds where a dominant owner is a foreign investor and anonymous or unidentified sources. The political parties may not keep funds in foreign banks or other financial institutions outside of the Republic of Macedonia. The supervision over the financial and material operations of political parties is conducted by the Ministry of Finance and the State Audit Office. Pursuant to legal regulations, political parties submit their annual account of financial operations to the Ministry of Finance, the Public Revenue Office, the Central Register and the State Audit Office.  The political parties prepare an annual financial report for the preceding year not later than 31 March, and submit it to the State Audit Office. The Law prescribes sanctions for the entities that do not abide by determined norms and rules on the amount of funds granted to political parties and for the political party and the responsible person; for not preparing and submitting a report to competent bodies.  The Law on Prevention of Corruption prescribes that the financing of political parties, trade unions or associations of citizens is public and they may not collect funds in cash from unidentified sources.  The Law also prescribes that political parties, unions or associations of citizens, during election campaigns, may not be funded from budgetary funds, public funds or funds of public enterprises and public institutions or legal persons managing with state capital, unless otherwise determined by law.  New investments and extraordinary payments during all election campaigns are also prohibited, unless these funds have been previously allocated for that specific purpose i.e. unless a previously determined programme is being realised. Extraordinary payments are extraordinary payments of salaries, pensions, social welfare or other payments from the Budget, or public funds.  The State Commission for Prevention of the Corruption has the authority to undertake measures when there is a suspicion of abuse of budgetary or public funds during an election campaign. If these suspicions are well founded, the Commission shall inform the responsible authorities.  The State Commission for Prevention of Corruption within three months from the day of closing the elections shall submit a report to the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia on possible abuses of budgetary and public funds, and funds from public enterprises and other legal entities managing with state capital. The report shall also be published in the media.  At least 20 Representatives of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia may initiate control on possible abuse of budgetary and public funds, for which, pursuant to Article 76, paragraph 4 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, a permanent survey commission shall be set up.   A political party, union or association of citizens may be fined if they collect funds in cash or from an unidentified source. Subject to fine shall also be the responsible person in the legal entity. The Law on State Audit was adopted in 1997 and was amended in 2001, 2003 and 2004 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 65/97, 70/01, 31/03,19/04 and 73/94- consolidated text). In order to avoid conflict of interests between the political and public positions and the private sector the amendments of the Law on State Audit adopted in 2003 have introduced the external state control (audit) of political parties funded by budget funds.  The Social partners of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, organised on a voluntary basis in unions, are autonomous in expressing and representing their members’ interests as well as in building relations with state bodies and other institutions. The right to union organisation derives from Article 37, paragraph 1 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia pursuant to which citizens have the right to establish trade unions in order to exercise their economic and social rights. The trade union organisation has been regulated in a separate Chapter of the Law on Labour Relations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/93, 3/94, 14/95, 53/97, 59/97, 21/98, 25/00, 34/00, 50,01, 25/03 40/03 and 80/03 - consolidated text). Pursuant to Article 84, paragraph 3 of the Law, accession to trade unions is subject to conditions determined by the Statute. The Law on Civil Servants (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, 17/04 and 69/04) that regulates the status, rights, duties and responsibilities of civil servants, also regulates the question of trade union organisation . Pursuant to Article 26 of this Law, in order to exercise their economic and social rights, civil servants may constitute trade unions and may become their members under conditions and mode determined by law. According to the Law, a civil servant, apart from other responsible bodies, may also appeal to the trade union for protection in exercising his/her rights related to his/her employment. According to provisions found in the statutes, the trade unions in order to perform their functions provide financial resources from membership fees, gifts, contributions, sponsorships and other sources. The amount of the membership fee which is obligatory is determined in percentage from the net salary. The highest body of the trade union adopts a decision on how the membership fee shall be allocated The financial and material operations of the trade unions are carried out in accordance with legal provisions. A Supervisory Board comprising members of trade unions shall perform the control on financial and material operations. Supervisory board members may not be members of the Assembly or Presidency of the Union. These solutions ensure  a full autonomy and impartiality of the bodies established to perform duties assigned by the trade union. Pursuant to Article 61, paragraph 1 of the Law on Associations of Citizens and Foundations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 31/98) non-governmental organisations and foundations may acquire objects, finances and property rights. These funds are obtained from membership fees, contributions, and donations, and may be used in accordance with the Statute and a law. The associations of citizens and foundations may receive funds from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia, the local self-government budgets and from the budget of the City of Skopje. Budgetary funds may only be acquired on the basis of a previously prepared program (project) by the associations of citizens and foundations which must be approved by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, i. e by the responsible ministries, or councils of local self-government units and the Council of the City of Skopje. Article 63 of the Law on Associations of Citizens and Foundations determines the body that shall perform control on the inappropriate use and command of funds and incomes of the citizens’ associations and foundations. The body that performs control comprises of members of the citizen's association or foundation that are elected in a manner determined by the statute. Every member has the right to require inspection on the expenditures of the funds and incomes in a mode determined by the statute. The financing of non-governmental organisations and foundations from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia is made on a regular basis through allocation of funds under special item. Funds are distributed pursuant to the Decision on the Criteria and Procedure for Distribution of Financial Assets to Associations of Citizens and Foundations from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 60/00). The allocation of the funds is realised in a transparent manner, through a public announcement published in the media annually. The applicants to the public announcement  have to submit the following documents: an annual programme; a list of completed projects and programmes for the previous year; financial support by associations of citizens and foundations determined by the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia; a project proposal for the current year financing; statute and registration permit; a report on received funds for the preceding fiscal year from the Ministry of Finance and modes of their implementation; and an approval for their own financial participation in the implementation  of project proposals and programmes. The allocation of the budgetary funds for associations of citizens and foundations is conducted by the Government upon the proposal of a special committee established for that purpose. The decision of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia is published in the Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia. 15. Do effective codes of conduct, and other measures enhancing corporate social responsibility, exist for the private sector to prevent corrupt practices? In the last several years, in the Republic of Macedonia there has been a growing interest on the issue of social responsibility, primarily in terms of preventing corrupt practises. The role and position of the private sector in preventing corrupt practices has been considered and concrete initiatives and approaches are being defined.  The initiative for drafting the Code of Ethics in Good Corporate Governance and the Code of Ethics in Business, arising from the new Company Law (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 28/04) is aimed at strengthening the responsibility of managers and corporate governance. The development of these Codes of Ethics for companies in order to prevent corruption and encourage companies to contribute to the society they operate in is a step to be undertaken in the forthcoming period.  The new Law on Securities will enable greater competitiveness at the capital market in the Republic of Macedonia in terms of offering brokerage services, as well as a greater transparency in the work not only of banks and brokerage firms that participate in the capital market, but also of joint stock companies with specific reporting obligations, the management bodies’ members, general managers, and the individual share holders. This Law inter alia envisages that large foreign brokerage firms may open branch offices in the country. In addition to creating greater competitiveness at the stock markets in the country, the new Law will facilitate significantly higher level of transparency in the work of stock market institutions.  The aforementioned Codes of Ethics considered as “soft law” are expected to be adopted in the course of 2005 The contents of the Codes of Ethics would be along the following lines:    Prohibition of bribery (receiving and giving bribes) and other forms of corruption, such as for example tax evasion;    Development of internal investigation and reporting systems on this issue;    Publishing reports on the level of corruption and the actions undertaken for its suppression. Lack of such reports would imply that the company is not dealing with corruption;    Transparency of companies in respect of contracts, licences, financing election campaigns, etc, and fully transparent payment of taxes;    Creating incentives encouraging conduct in accordance with laws, such as for example promoting employees for such law abiding conduct;    Preventing engagement of local subjects by foreign companies to do "dirty business" , that would mean only transfer of the blame for corrupt practise;    Allocation of funds for support of civil society organisations which promote the rule of law and anti-corruption.  The experiences and activities of the Macedonian Chamber of Commerce and Amcham, and the activities at the Faculty of Economics at the Ss. Cyril and Methodius University could serve as an illustration of certain initiatives and activities which in the wider sense are related to the issue of advancing corporate social responsibility for purposes of preventing corrupt practices in the private sector.  The Chamber of Commerce of the Republic of Macedonia is involved primarily in training and promotional activities. One of such activities is the promotion of the Code of Ethics in Business Activities - Association of Balkan Chambers (ABC), Macedonia being one of the founding countries (1994).  The Chamber is conducting these activities by periodical publishing of the Code of Ethics in its publications, in the weekly publication – the Bulletin, and in the monthly publication of the Economic Magazine.  Another institution is the Court of Honour (established in 1990) responsible for protection of good business practices in the work of the Chamber members, as well as for prevention of activities of unfair competition and monopoly conduct at the market. In respect of education and prevention activities in the private sector, under the regional project Trade and Transport Facilitation in South East Europe - TTFSE, initiated by the SECI (South East European Cooperation Initiative), financed by the World Bank and by the US Government, the Chamber of Commerce has organised 48 seminars, elaborating 3 modules within one seminar: Business Ethics and Corruption, Foreign Trade Operations and Transport Operations, Customs Transit Procedures.  These interactive seminars and the operative manual have been prepared by the Chamber of Commerce of the Republic of Macedonia as the host of MAKPRO –SECI –National Pro-Committee, engaging lecturers-practitioners, specially trained for these seminars at the Koc University in Istanbul. A total of 954 participants have been covered with the training, 794 entrepreneurs from 657 companies and 160 customs officers from 14 cities.  The Module Business Ethics and Corruption has the following thematic units: A-Business Ethics and B –Corruption. Finally, under the same Project the Chamber of Commerce/MAKPRO, using software designed by the World Bank, continually conducts an anonymous surveys (among its members, companies dealing with international trade, transport and shipping), about the efficiency and corruption of the border crossing points, departments of ministries, and other agencies at border crossings, authorised for issuance of relevant export-import documentation. The survey is a useful indicator of the situation, and a tool promoting anti-corruptive conduct. In the Republic of Macedonia the concept of corporate social responsibility is relatively new, and in terms of education, the first time it has been elaborated in details was at the beginning of 2002. Students and professors of the Faculty of Economics at the University of Ss. Cyril and Methodius participated in the Future Leader’s E-Conference on Corporate Social Responsibility. One of the main issues discussed at the Conference was the relations between corporate social responsibility and corruption. A total of 1122 young people from 100 countries worldwide participated in this six week on-line conference. Macedonia, according to the number and quality of its participants, was ranked 10, preceded by Japan and followed by Canada. Today, the concept of corporate social responsibility is part of the curricula of several subjects studied at the Faculty of Economics in Skopje.  16. When did the Republic of Macedonia become a member of the Council of Europe Group of States Against Corruption (GRECO) and what measures have been taken to implement GRECO recommendations? The Republic of Macedonia has been a member of the GRECO (Group of States against corruption) since 06.10.2000. It was the 26 GRECO country to be examined in the First Evaluation Round. The evaluation team visited the Republic of Macedonia in March 2002, after being provided by Macedonian authorities with a reply to the Evaluation questionnaire.  The visit resulted with an Evaluation Report of the Republic of Macedonia (adopted on the 12th GRECO General Meeting, 9-13.12.2002, Strasbourg), containing recommendations for government institutions. In order to implement the recommendations contained in the Report, the Republic of Macedonia undertakes a range of activities in the fields of legislation and institutions. The Progress Report on the Harmonisation and Implementation of the Recommendations of the First Evaluation Report of the Republic of Macedonia was adopted on the 21 plenary session of GRECO held in Strasbourg on 29.11.2004 – 02.12.2004.  In the meantime, the Ministry of Justice has delivered the reply to the second GRECO Questionnaire and the second monitoring visit to the Republic of Macedonia also took place (06-10.12 2004). A number of meetings between representatives of government and non-government institutions, among which: representatives of the Ministry of Justice, the Ministry of Finance, the Ministry of the Interior, the Customs Administration, State Audit, the Public Revenue Office, representatives from the judiciary and prosecution, the Civil Servants Agency, Transparency Macedonia, the Chamber of Lawyers, the Judges Association of the Republic of Macedonia, the Prosecutors Association of the Republic of Macedonia, the Centre for Continuous Education of Judges and others took place.   The priority topics of the visit were proceeds of corruption, legal entities and corruption, public administration and corruption.  Concerning the commitments of the Republic of Macedonia, in accordance with the recommendations of the GRECO evaluation team, the Republic of Macedonia ratified the Criminal Law Convention on Corruption (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 32/99) and the Civil Law Convention on Corruption of the Council of Europe (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 13/02) and has signed the Additional Protocol to the Criminal Law Convention on Preventing Corruption (15 May 2003). The Law on Prevention of Corruption (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 28/2002) was also adopted, and the Law Amending the Law on Prevention of Corruption (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04) provides: raising the degree of autonomy and independence of the State Commission and enhancement of its role in the protection of persons working on suppression of corruption and protection of the members of the Commission.  In November 2002 the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia elected the members of the State Commission for Prevention of Corruption, which has both a preventive and a supervisory role and it is autonomous and independent in carrying out its competences.  In June 2003 the Commission adopted the National Programme for Prevention and Suppression of Corruption, containing recommendations on the necessary measures and activities to be undertaken in order to establish an efficient mechanism for prevention and suppression of corruption. An integral part of the anticorruption programme of the State Commission is the Action Plan containing measures to be undertaken in short, mid and long-term by the competent authorities for preventing and sanctioning corruption. Along with these activities, and in accordance with the recommendations of the GRECO team, the necessary amendments to Article 17 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia were adopted on 26.12.2003, whereby, the use of special investigative measures was allowed in criminal investigations for the most serious criminal offences, including corruption, but only upon a court decision, under conditions and in a procedure established by law and if this is necessary to prevent or reveal criminal offences, for conducting a criminal procedure, or when it is required by the interests of the security and defence of the Republic.  The preparation of the new Law on Interception of Communications is underway in order for the new constitutional provision to obtain its legal regulation. These legal amendments  will be followed-up with appropriate training and appropriate technical equipment for police officers, prosecutors, investigative judges and judges. In order to create and above all implement a comprehensive legal framework precisely defining measures for witness protection, establishing a procedure for interviewing collaborators of justice and other witnesses whose identity is known only to the competent judicial body, in accordance with the GRECO recommendations, the following activities are undertaken: The new amendments to the Law on Criminal Procedure (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/04) provide a new chapter entitled Protection of Witnesses, Collaborators of Justice and Victims (Article 270-a, 270-b). These provisions enable the public prosecutor, i.e. investigative judge or council chairman to undertake actions in the course of the procedure to ensure efficient protection of witnesses, collaborators of justice and victims if they appear in the procedure as witnesses when there is a danger of them being exposed to intimidation, threat with revenge or danger to their life, health of physical integrity, or when their protection is necessary. The new text of the Draft Law on Witness Protection, which is in Parliament procedure, is toward the implementation of the provisions contained in the Law on Criminal Procedure. Towards implementing one of the GRECO recommendations, is the new Law on the Public Prosecutor’s Office (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.38/04) which present the legal base for the establishment of the Unit for fight organised crime and corruption, within the Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 29 of the Law on the Public Prosecutor’s Office). The Unit has been established and it acts for crimes for which prosecution is undertaken ex-officio  and which have been committed by an organised group of at least three persons working for a certain period for the purpose of obtaining direct or indirect financial benefit or another kind of material benefit, and which commits one or more crimes, as well as for other crimes for which a prison sentence of at least four years is prescribed by law. The department is responsible to act before basic courts on the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia. The Law on Financial Police (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 55/2002) confirm the competence of the Financial police for investigating suspicious agreements as a form of corruptive behaviour.  As regards the GRECO recommendations concerning the issue of immunity, they are not implemented as their realisation imposes amendment to the existing constitutional solution. Namely, the issue of which person and under which conditions enjoy immunity is regulated by the Constitution.       Chapter I             Political Criteria 